Utah statutes.
26-52-203.   Administration of services for eligible individuals.

(1) (a)  The department shall establish a mechanism to:

(i)  identify the children who are eligible to receive services from the account in accordance with the standards for eligibility established in rules adopted by the committee under Subsection 26-52-202(4); and

(ii)  review and pay for services provided to a child under this chapter.

(b)  The department may contract with another state agency or a private entity to assist with the mechanism to identify eligible children, provide for services, and pay for services.

(2)  The department, or the entity selected to assist the department under Subsection (1) may negotiate with providers of the services that are eligible under this chapter to maximize efficiencies and quality of services to children.



Enacted by Chapter 402, 2012 General Session

